California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) Through permits or memorandums of understanding, the department may authorize individuals, public agencies, universities, zoological gardens, and scientific or educational institutions, to import, export, take, or possess any endangered species, threatened species, or candidate species for scientific, educational, or management purposes.

(b) The department may authorize, by permit, the take of endangered species, threatened species, and candidate species if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The take is incidental to an otherwise lawful
 activity.

(2) The impacts of the authorized take shall be minimized and fully mitigated. The measures required to meet this obligation shall be roughly proportional in extent to the impact of the authorized taking on the species. Where various measures are available to meet this obligation, the measures required shall maintain the applicant’s objectives to the greatest extent possible. All required measures shall be capable of successful implementation. For purposes of this section only, impacts of taking include all impacts on the species that result from any act that would cause the proposed taking.

(3) (A) The applicant shall ensure adequate funding to implement the measures required by paragraph (2), and for monitoring compliance with, and
 effectiveness of, those measures.

(B) For purposes of this section, transportation funding identified in the State Highway System Management Plan shall be presumed to ensure adequate funding for the long-term maintenance of a habitat connectivity or wildlife corridor structure on the state highway system, but not for the habitat on or around the structure. To ensure adequate funding to maintain the habitat on or around the structure, the applicant shall provide an endowment.

(c) No permit may be issued pursuant to subdivision (b) if issuance of the permit would jeopardize the continued existence of the species. The department shall make this determination based on the best scientific and other information that is reasonably available, and shall include consideration of the
 species’ capability to survive and reproduce, and any adverse impacts of the taking on those abilities in light of (1) known population trends; (2) known threats to the species; and (3) reasonably foreseeable impacts on the species from other related projects and activities.

(d) The department shall adopt regulations to aid in the implementation of subdivision (b) and the requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, with respect to authorization of take. The department may seek certification pursuant to Section 21080.5 of the Public Resources Code to implement subdivision (b).

(e) Commencing January 1, 2019, the department shall post each new permit issued pursuant to subdivision (b) on its internet website within 15 days of the effective date of the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.1.

Nothing in this chapter or in any other provision of law prohibits the taking or the incidental taking of any endangered, threatened, or candidate species if the taking was authorized by the department through a permit or memorandum of understanding, or in a natural communities conservation plan, habitat conservation plan, habitat management plan, or other plan or agreement approved by or entered into by the department, or in an amendment to such a permit, memorandum of understanding, plan, or agreement and all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The application process commenced on or before April 10, 1997.

(b) The department approved the permit, memorandum of understanding, plan, agreement, or amendment thereto within either of the following timeframes:

(A) On or before April 10, 1997.

(B) Between April 10, 1997, and January 1, 1998, and the department also certifies that the permit, memorandum of understanding, plan, agreement, or amendment thereto meets the substantive criteria of subdivision (b) of Section 2081.

The permits, memoranda of understanding, plan, agreements, and amendments thereto described in this section are deemed to be in full force and effect, as of the date approved or entered into by the parties insofar as they authorize the take of species. This section does not apply to the “Emergency Management Measures Permit” issued by the department on March 15, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Permit” means any authorization issued by the department pursuant to this article to take a species listed by this chapter as candidate, threatened, or endangered. The term includes a consistency determination pursuant to Section 2080.1 and a concurrence determination pursuant to Section 2080.3 or 2080.4.

(2) “Permit application” means an application for a permit, an amendment to a permit, or a renewal of a permit. The term includes a consistency determination request pursuant to Section 2080.1 and a concurrence determination request pursuant to Section 2080.3 or 2080.4.

(3) “Permittee” includes any individual, firm, association, organization, partnership, business, trust, corporation, limited liability company, district, city, county, city and county, town, federal agency, and the state who applies for or who has received a permit pursuant to this article.

(4) “Project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.

(5) “Project cost” means the total direct and indirect project expenses that include, but are not limited to, labor, equipment, permanent materials and supplies, subcontracts, overhead, and miscellaneous costs. The term shall not include permit or license expenses or mitigation costs. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “permit” includes, but is not limited to, a permit as defined in paragraph (1).

(6) “Voluntary habitat restoration project” means a project that meets both of the following requirements:

(A) The project’s primary purpose is voluntary habitat restoration and the project may have other environmental benefits, and the project is not required as mitigation due to a regulatory action.

(B) The project is not part of a regulatory settlement, a regulatory enforcement action, or a court order.

(b) (1) The department shall collect a permit application fee for processing a permit application submitted pursuant to this article at the time the permit application is submitted to the department. Upon appropriation to the department from the Endangered Species Permitting Account, the department shall use the permit application fee
 to pay for all or a portion of the department’s cost of processing permit applications, permit development, and compliance monitoring pursuant to this article.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any of the following:

(A) Activities or costs associated with the review of projects, inspection and oversight of projects, and permits necessary to conduct timber operations, as defined in Section 4527 of the Public Resources Code, in accordance with Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 4629) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code.

(B) Permits or memoranda of understanding authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 2081.

(C) Permits for voluntary habitat restoration projects.

(c) The department shall assess the permit application fee as follows, subject to subdivision (f):

(1) For a project, regardless of estimated project cost, that is subject only to Section 2080.1, 2080.3, or 2080.4, the department shall assess either of the following amounts:

(A) Seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

(B) Six thousand dollars ($6,000), if the project uses a department-approved conservation or mitigation bank to fulfill mitigation obligations pursuant to this article.

(2) For a project where the estimated project cost is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the department shall assess either of the following amounts:

(A) Seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

(B) Six thousand dollars ($6,000), if the project uses a department-approved conservation or mitigation bank to fulfill mitigation obligations pursuant to this article.

(3) For a project where the estimated project cost is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more but less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), the department shall assess either of the following amounts:

(A) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(B) Twelve thousand dollars ($12,000), if the project uses a department-approved conservation or mitigation bank to fulfill mitigation obligations pursuant to this article.

(4) For a project where the estimated project cost is five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more, the department shall assess either of the following amounts:

(A) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(B) Twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000), if the project uses a department-approved conservation or mitigation bank to fulfill mitigation obligations pursuant to this article.

(5) The department shall collect a fee of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for processing permit amendments that the department has determined are minor as defined in regulation or fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for processing permit amendments that the department has determined are major as defined in regulation.

(d) (1) If the
 permit application fee paid pursuant to subdivision (c) is determined by the department to be insufficient to complete permitting work due to the complexity of a project or the potential effects of a project, the department shall collect an additional fee of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from the permittee to pay for its estimated costs. Upon its determination, the department shall notify the permittee of the reasons why an additional fee is necessary and the estimated amount of the additional fee.

(2) The additional fee collected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed an amount that, when added to the fee paid pursuant to subdivision (c), equals thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000). The department shall collect the additional fee before a final decision on the permit application by the department.

(e) (1) For a permit application submitted to
 the department pursuant to this article on or after September 13, 2016, the department shall collect the permit application fee at the time the permit application is submitted. The department shall not deem the permit application complete until it has collected the permit application fee. A permit application submitted or deemed complete before September 13, 2016, shall not be subject to fees established pursuant to this section.

(2) If a permit application is withdrawn within 30 days after paying the permit application fee, the department shall refund any unused portion of the fee to the permittee.

(3) If a permit application is withdrawn after 30 days of paying the permit application fee, the department shall not refund any portion of the fee to the permittee.

(f) (1) The department shall
 adjust the fees in this section pursuant to Section 713.

(2) The Legislature finds that all revenues generated under this section and used for the purposes for which they were imposed are not subject to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(3) The department, at least every five years, shall analyze permit application fees pursuant to Section 713 to ensure the appropriate fee amounts are charged.

(g) Fees paid to the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Endangered Species Permitting Account, which is hereby established in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. Funds in the account shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of administering and implementing this chapter, except that fee moneys collected pursuant
 to this section shall only be used for the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 41.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.4.

(a) The department may authorize, under this chapter, the take of the rough sculpin (Cottus asperrimus) resulting from impacts attributable to replacing the Spring Creek Bridge in the County of Shasta, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied for the take of the rough sculpin.

(2) The department ensures that all further measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 are incorporated into the project.

(3) The take
 authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with federal and state agencies, of a monitoring program and an adaptive management process until the department determines that any impacts resulting from the replacement of the Spring Creek Bridge have been fully mitigated.

(b) This section shall not be construed to exempt the project described in subdivision (a) from any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.5.

(a) The department may authorize under this chapter, by permit, the take of the Santa Cruz long-toed salamander (Ambystoma macrodactylum croceum) resulting from impacts attributable to the construction along the State Route 156 corridor through Moro Cojo Slough in the County of Monterey for the purpose of enhancing safety and access, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied for the take of the Santa Cruz long-toed salamander.

(2) The department ensures that all further measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 are incorporated into the
 construction project. 

(3) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with federal and state agencies, of a monitoring program and an adaptive management process until the department determines that any impacts resulting from the construction project described in this subdivision have been fully mitigated.

(b) The conditions for the permit are subject to amendment if required by the monitoring program and the adaptive management process adopted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall not be construed to exempt the construction project described in subdivision (a) from any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (SB 1231)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.6.

(a) The department may authorize, under this chapter, the take of the unarmored threespine stickleback (Gasterosteus aculeatus williamsoni) resulting from impacts attributable to the habitat restoration project to restore, maintain, and improve riparian habitat on public lands in the geographic area defined in paragraph (1) and projects to restore the flow capacity to Bouquet Creek in Bouquet Canyon on public lands, undertaken by the Los Angeles County Department of Public Works, the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, and the United States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The take authorization is limited to the portion of Bouquet
 Creek located from a position normal to mile marker 8.3 on Bouquet Canyon Road to a position normal to mile marker 16.3 on Bouquet Canyon Road, inclusive.

(2) The department has determined that the appropriate agreements have been executed to address environmental impacts at the Bouquet Canyon area, including, but not limited to, Bouquet Creek.

(3) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied for the take of the unarmored threespine stickleback.

(4) The department ensures that all further measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 are incorporated into the projects. 

(5) A biologist will be on duty whenever an
 activity is conducted that may affect the unarmored threespine stickleback.

(6) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with federal and state agencies, of a monitoring program and an adaptive management process that satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 for monitoring the effectiveness of, and adjusting, as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully mitigate the impacts of the authorized take.

(7) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with state and federal agencies, of an adaptive management process that substantially contributes to the long-term conservation of the unarmored threespine stickleback.

(b) This section shall not be construed to exempt the projects described in subdivision
 (a) from any other law.

(c) This section shall not be construed to affect the contractual obligations of the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power to provide water from Bouquet Reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (AB 353)   Effective October 8, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 3511, 4700, 5050, and 5515, and contingent upon the fulfillment of the conditions listed in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), the department may authorize, under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800), the take of species resulting from impacts attributable to the implementation of the Quantification Settlement Agreement, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Chapter 617 of the Statutes of 2002, on all of the following:

(1) The salinity, elevation, shoreline habitat, or water quality of the Salton Sea.

(2) The quantity and quality of water flowing in the All American Canal, the Coachella Canal, the Imperial Valley and Coachella Valley drains, the New and Alamo Rivers, the Coachella Valley Stormwater Channel, and the habitat sustained by those flows.

(3) Agricultural lands in the Imperial Valley.

(4) The quantity and quality of water flowing in the Colorado River, the habitat sustained by those flows, and the collection of that water for delivery to authorized users.

(b) The Quantification Settlement Agreement is executed by the appropriate parties on or before October 12, 2003.

(c) The department has determined that the appropriate agreements have been executed to address environmental impacts at the Salton Sea that include enforceable commitments requiring all of the following:

(1) Imperial Irrigation District to transfer 800,000 acre-feet of conserved water, by conservation methods selected by the Imperial Irrigation District, to the Department of Water Resources on a mutually agreed-upon schedule in exchange for payment of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) per acre-foot. The price shall be adjusted for inflation on an annual basis.

(2) Imperial Irrigation District to transfer up to 800,000 additional acre-feet of conserved water, by conservation methods selected by the Imperial Irrigation District, to the Department of Water Resources during the first 15 years of the Quantification Settlement Agreement on the schedule established for the mitigation water that was previously to be transferred to the San Diego Water Authority, or on a mutually agreed-upon schedule, at no cost for the water in addition to the payment for the water from the mitigation fund described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Chapter 613 of the Statutes of 2003.

(3) As a condition to acquisition of the water described in paragraph (1), the Department of Water Resources shall be responsible for any environmental impacts, including Salton Sea salinity, related to use or transfer of that water. As a condition to acquisition of the water described in paragraph (2), the Department of Water Resources shall be responsible for environmental impacts related to Salton Sea salinity that are related to the use or transfer of that water.

(4) The Metropolitan Water District of Southern California (MWD) to purchase up to 1.6 million acre-feet of the water provided in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2) from the Department of Water Resources at a price of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per acre-foot on a mutually agreed-upon schedule. The price shall be adjusted for inflation on an annual basis. The Department of Water Resources shall deposit all proceeds from the sale of water pursuant to this paragraph, after deducting costs and reasonable administrative expenses, into the Salton Sea Restoration Fund established in Section 2932.

(5) The Metropolitan Water District of Southern California to pay not less than twenty dollars ($20) per acre-foot for all special surplus water received by MWD as a result of reinstatement of access to that water under the Interim Surplus Guidelines by the United States Department of Interior subtracting any water delivered to Arizona as a result of a shortage. The money shall be paid into the Salton Sea Restoration Fund. The price shall be adjusted for inflation on an annual basis. Metropolitan Water District of Southern California shall receive a credit against future mitigation obligations under the Lower Colorado River Multi-Species Conservation Plan for any funds provided under this paragraph to the extent that those funds are spent on projects that contribute to the conservation or mitigation for species identified in the Lower Colorado River Multi-Species Conservation Plan and that are consistent with the preferred alternative for Salton Sea restoration.

(6) Coachella Valley Water District, Imperial Irrigation District, and San Diego County Water Authority to pay a total of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to the Salton Sea Restoration Fund as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Chapter 613 of the Statutes of 2003.

(d) All of the following conditions are met:

(1) The requirements of subdivision (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied as to the species for which take is authorized.

(2) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with federal and state agencies, of an adaptive management process for monitoring the effectiveness of, and adjusting as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully mitigate the impacts of the authorized take. The adjusted measures are subject to Section 2052.1.

(3) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation in cooperation with state and federal agencies of an adaptive management process that substantially contributes to the long-term conservation of the species for which take is authorized. Preparation of the adaptive management program and implementation of the program is the responsibility of the department. The department’s obligation to prepare and implement the adaptive management program is conditioned upon the availability of funds pursuant to the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Act of 2002, if it is approved by the voters at the statewide general election to be held November 5, 2002 (Proposition 50), or other funds that may be appropriated by the Legislature or approved by the voters for that purpose. The failure to appropriate funds does not relieve the applicant of the obligations of paragraphs (1) and (2). However, the applicant shall not be required to fund any program pursuant to this paragraph.

(4) The requirements of paragraph (1) may be satisfied if the take is authorized under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800).

(e) (1) The Secretary of the Resources Agency, in consultation with the department, the Department of Water Resources, the Salton Sea Authority, appropriate air quality districts, and the Salton Sea Advisory Committee, shall undertake a restoration study to determine a preferred alternative for the restoration of the Salton Sea ecosystem and the protection of wildlife dependent on that ecosystem. The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall extend an invitation to the United States Geological Survey Salton Sea Science Office to also participate in the restoration study, and the office may participate if it accepts the invitation. The restoration study shall be conducted pursuant to a process with deadlines for release of the report and programmatic environmental documents established by the secretary, in consultation with the department, the Department of Water Resources, the Salton Sea Authority, and the Salton Sea Advisory Committee, and the United States Geological Survey Salton Sea Science Office, if it is a participant. The secretary shall use all available authority to enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the Secretary of the Interior, as provided in Section 101(b)(1)(B)(i) of the Salton Sea Reclamation Act of 1998 (P.L. 105-372) for the purpose of obtaining federal participation in the restoration of the Salton Sea.

(2) The restoration study shall establish all of the following:

(A) An evaluation of alternatives for the restoration of the Salton Sea that includes consideration of strategies for salinity control, habitation creation and restoration, and different shoreline elevations and surface area configurations. The alternatives shall consider the range of possible inflow conditions. The evaluation established pursuant to this subparagraph shall also include suggested criteria for selecting and evaluating alternatives consistent with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2930), including, but not limited to, at least one most cost-effective, technically feasible, alternative.

(B) An evaluation of the magnitude and practicability of costs of construction, operation, and maintenance of each alternative evaluated.

(C) A recommended plan for the use or transfer of water provided by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). No water may be transferred pursuant to that subdivision unless the secretary finds that transfer is consistent with the preferred alternative for Salton Sea restoration.

(D) The selection of a preferred alternative consistent with Section 2931, including a proposed funding plan to implement the preferred alternative. The proposed funding plan shall include a determination of the moneys that are, or may be, available to construct and operate the preferred project, including, but not limited to, all of the following moneys:

(i) Moneys in the Salton Sea Restoration Fund established by Section 2932.

(ii) State water and environmental bond moneys.

(iii) Federal authorizations and appropriations.

(iv) Moneys available through a Salton Sea Infrastructure Financing District established pursuant to Section 53395.9 of the Government Code and local assessments by the Salton Sea Authority or its member agencies.

(v) Moneys derived from user or other fees.

(3) The study identifying the preferred alternative shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2006.

(4) The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall establish an advisory committee for purposes of this subdivision as follows:

(A) The advisory committee shall be selected to provide balanced representation of the following interests:

(i) Agriculture.

(ii) Local governments.

(iii) Conservation groups.

(iv) Tribal governments.

(v) Recreational users.

(vi) Water agencies.

(vii) Air pollution control districts.

(viii) Geothermal energy development.

(B) Appropriate federal agency representatives may be asked to serve in an ex officio capacity.

(C) The Resources Agency shall consult with the advisory committee throughout all stages of the alternative selection process.

(D) The advisory committee shall meet no fewer than six times annually.

(E) The secretary shall appoint a vice chair of the advisory committee from the committee membership. The vice chair shall work with the secretary to develop advisory committee agendas and to schedule meetings of the committee. The secretary and vice chair shall appoint an agenda subcommittee to assist in the preparation of advisory committee agendas.

(F) The advisory committee shall submit to the Resources Agency recommendations to assist the agency in preparation of its restoration plan. The Resources Agency shall develop a schedule for the completion of these recommendations to ensure that these recommendations will be considered by the agency in a timely and meaningful manner as the restoration plan is developed. These recommendations may include, but are not limited to:

(i) The specific goals and objectives of the restoration plan.

(ii) The range of alternative restoration actions that must be developed and analyzed.

(iii) The no action alternative.

(iv) The criteria for determining economic and technical feasibility of the alternatives.

(v) The range of options for funding the restoration plan.

(vi) The selection of a preferred alternative for a restoration plan.

(G) The Resources Agency shall periodically provide an update to the advisory committee of the current work plan and schedule for the development of the restoration plan.

(f) This section shall not be construed to exempt from any other provision of law the Quantification Settlement Agreement and the Agreement for Transfer of Conserved Water by and between the Imperial Irrigation District and the San Diego County Water Authority, dated April 29, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 614, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.8.

The Resources Agency shall undertake the necessary activities to assess the protection of recreational opportunities, including, but not limited to, hunting, fishing, boating, and birdwatching, and the creation of opportunities for improved local economic conditions, surrounding the Salton Sea. The Resources Agency shall not undertake any of those activities if the agency determines they would constitute a project purpose for environmental documentation that is prepared pursuant to Section 2081.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 614, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5050, the department may authorize, under this chapter, the incidental take of limestone salamander (Hydromantes brunus) resulting from impacts attributable to the Department of Transportation’s implementation of the Ferguson Slide Permanent Restoration Project on State Route 140 from 8 miles east of Briceburg to 7.6 miles west of El Portal in Mariposa County, contingent upon the fulfillment of the following conditions:

(1) The Department of Transportation begins construction of the Ferguson Slide Permanent Restoration Project on or before January 1, 2016.

(2) The department has determined that the Department of
 Transportation will adopt appropriate avoidance and mitigation measures to protect the limestone salamander through enforceable commitments that, at a minimum, include the following:

(A) A construction work window that prevents initial ground-disturbing construction activities from occurring on the southern slope during the salamander’s active season of December to March, inclusive.

(B) Environmentally sensitive area fencing in the form of five-foot orange plastic mesh, as well as salamander protection exclusionary fencing in the form of 24-inch sheet metal, will be erected if construction-related activities will occur adjacent to limestone salamander habitat during their active season.

(C) A biological monitor will be onsite during active building to inspect the worksite and all exclusionary fencing.

(D) All ground-disturbing activities within 100 feet will cease if a limestone salamander is detected in an active construction site until the animal can be safely removed from the area according to an agreed-upon salvage plan.

(3) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied for the take of the limestone salamander.

(4) The department ensures that all further measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 are incorporated into the project.

(5) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with the department, of an adaptive management process for monitoring the effectiveness of, and adjusting as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully
 mitigate the impacts of the authorized take. The adjusted measures are subject to Section 2052.1.

(6) The failure to appropriate funds does not relieve the applicant of the obligations of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(7) Any observations of the species in the worksite and any accidental injury or mortality from vehicle strikes or other means will be reported to the department immediately and the onsite biological monitor will notify the resident engineer who will halt the work immediately.

(b) This section shall not be construed to exempt the Ferguson Slide Permanent Restoration Project on State Route 140 from 8 miles east of Briceburg to 7.6 miles west of El Portal in Mariposa County from any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (AB 1973)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.10.

(a) The department may authorize, under this chapter, the incidental take of unarmored threespine stickleback (Gasterosteus aculeatus williamsoni) attributable to the periodic dewatering, inspection, maintenance, modification, or repair, including emergency repair, of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California’s Foothill Feeder water supply facility from Castaic Dam to the Joseph Jensen Treatment Plant in the County of Los Angeles, contingent upon the fulfillment of the following conditions:

(1) The department determines that the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied for the take of the unarmored threespine
 stickleback.

(2) The department ensures that all further measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 are incorporated into the project.

(3) The take authorization provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with the department, of an adaptive management plan for monitoring the effectiveness of, and adjusting as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully mitigate the impacts of the authorized
 take and to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805.

(4) A biologist who has substantial relevant experience evaluating impacts to inland fisheries is on duty whenever an activity is conducted that may affect the unarmored threespine stickleback. 

(5) The Metropolitan Water District of Southern California consults with the department to consider feasible measures to avoid and minimize incidental take of unarmored threespine
 stickleback. For purposes of this paragraph, “feasible” has the same meaning as defined in Section 15364 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations. 

(b) The take authorization shall cover any incidental take of unarmored threespine stickleback attributable to the periodic dewatering, inspection, maintenance, modification, or repair, including emergency repair, of the Foothill Feeder that may occur in the following locations:

(1) Within the Santa Clara River, from the Bouquet Canyon Road Bridge to a point located 4,000 feet downstream of where Commerce Center Drive, as of January 1, 2016,
 dead-ends adjacent to the Santa Clara River.

(2) From the confluence with the Santa Clara River upstream to the following locations:

(A) In Charlie Canyon to a point 1,000 feet upstream of the Foothill Feeder facility dewatering structure.

(B) In San Francisquito Creek to the Copper Hill Drive bridge.

(C) In Placerita Creek to the Hacienda Lane crossing.

(D) In Bouquet Creek to the Newhall Ranch Road Bridge.

(c) The take authorization shall also cover any incidental take of unarmored threespine
 stickleback that may occur in the course of implementing mitigation or conservation actions required in the permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) as may be modified through an adaptive management plan adopted pursuant to
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) The permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include conditions that cover biological and scientific considerations including, but not limited to, criteria for the handling of stranded fish and their relocation into suitable habitat, the dewatering of the Foothill Feeder, and the reasonable and feasible mimicking of streamflows. The permit conditions shall be in compliance with the project description, mitigation measures, and release plan
 set forth in the certified environmental impact report known as the “Foothill Feeder Repair and Future Inspections Project Environmental Impact Report, January 2005, State Clearinghouse Number 2005071082.” The permit conditions are subject to amendment when required by the adaptive management plan or when modified by a subsequent final environmental document pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(e) This section shall not be construed to exempt from any other law the periodic dewatering, inspection, maintenance, modification, or repair of the
 Foothill Feeder.

(f) If the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California receives a permit under this section, the permit shall require the district to report to the department within six months after every dewatering of the Foothill Feeder. The report shall address compliance with the permit conditions and the effectiveness of the adaptive management plan in contributing to the conservation of the unarmored threespine stickleback. The Metropolitan Water District of Southern California shall ensure that each report is made available to the public.

(g) As used in this section, “modification” does not include alterations to expand the maximum physical capacity of the Foothill Feeder to deliver water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.11.

(a) The department may authorize, under this chapter, the take or possession of the Lost River sucker (Deltistes luxatus and Catostomus luxatus) and shortnose sucker (Chasmistes brevirostris) resulting from impacts attributable to or otherwise related to the decommissioning and removal of the Iron Gate Dam, the Copco 1 Dam, the Copco 2 Dam, or the J.C. Boyle Dam, each located on the Klamath River, consistent with the Klamath Hydroelectric Settlement Agreement, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The department finds the authorized take will not jeopardize the continued existence of the Lost River sucker or shortnose sucker.

(2) The impacts of the authorized take are
 minimized.

(3) The take authorization requires department approval of a sampling, salvage, and relocation plan to be implemented and that describes the measures necessary to minimize the take of adult Lost River sucker and shortnose sucker associated with the department’s authorization. The plan shall provide for a sampling effort, the results of which will provide information used to make decisions and to implement the plan while utilizing the principles of adaptive management.

(b) This section shall not be construed to exempt the project described in subdivision (a) from any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   (AB 2640)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.12.
